California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------

15106.

A unified school district or community college district may issue bonds that, in aggregation with bonds issued pursuant to Section 15270, shall not exceed 2.5 percent of the taxable property of the school district or community college district, or the school facilities improvement district, if applicable, as shown by the last equalized assessment of the county or counties in which the district is located.

In computing the outstanding bonded indebtedness of a unified school district or community college district for all purposes of this section, any outstanding bonds shall be deemed to have been issued for elementary school purposes, high school purposes, and community college purposes, respectively, in the respective amounts that the proceeds of the sale of those outstanding bonds, excluding any premium and accrued interest received on that sale, were or have been allocated by the governing board of the unified school district or community college district to each of those purposes respectively.

(a) For the purposes of the State School Building Aid Law of 1952 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16000)) with respect to applications for apportionments and apportionments filed or made prior to September 15, 1961, and to the repayment thereof, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700), inclusive, only, a unified school district shall be considered to have a bonding capacity in the amount permitted by law for an elementary school district and a bonding capacity in the amount permitted by law for a high school district.

(b) For purposes of this section, the taxable property of a district for a fiscal year shall be calculated to include, but not be limited to, the assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the district, which shall be derived by dividing the gross assessed value of the unitary and operating nonunitary property within the district for the 1987–88 fiscal year by the gross assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property within the county in which the district is located for the 1987–88 fiscal year, and multiplying the result by the gross assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the county on the last equalized assessment roll. In the event of the unification of two or more school districts or community college districts subsequent to the 1987–88 fiscal year, the assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the unified district or community college district shall be deemed to be the total of the assessed value of the taxable property of each of the unifying districts as that assessed value would be determined under Section 15102.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15107.

In computing the limitation of indebtedness of a school district, community college district, or school facilities improvement district of any kind or class up to this time or in the future formed or organized, hereinafter in this section referred to as the “bonding district,” the outstanding indebtedness of any previously existing district all or any part of which forms a component part of the bonding district and the outstanding indebtedness of any district for which any territory that has become a part of the bonding district is liable shall be excluded and shall not be deemed, for the purposes of computing the limitation of indebtedness under Section 15102 or 15106, to constitute outstanding indebtedness of the bonding district, except to the extent that the outstanding indebtedness has been expressly assumed by the bonding district by vote of not less than two-thirds of the electors of the bonding district voting at an election at which the proposition of assuming the indebtedness is voted upon. Nothing contained in this section shall operate to release any property from liability for taxes to pay the principal and interest of indebtedness incurred by any component district or for which any territory that has become a part of the bonding district is liable and in which the taxable property is located at the time of the incurring of the indebtedness. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide in this section a special method of computing the limitation of indebtedness of school districts or community college districts irrespective of liability of the area embraced within the school districts for the payment of any bonded indebtedness. This section does not authorize the issuance of bonds in excess of the limits expressed in Section 15334.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15108.

For the purpose of determining the limitation of indebtedness of a school district, community college district, or school facilities improvement district of any kind or class under Section 15102 or 15106, that portion of the bonded indebtedness of the district for which another district or territory in another district is liable shall be excluded and shall not be deemed to constitute outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15109.

Where an elementary school district and a high school district with a combined average daily attendance of 300,000 or more are governed by the same governing board, and the pupils in grades seven and eight in the districts are in attendance at high schools maintained by the high school district, the governing board, by resolution filed with the county auditor, may provide that the bond issuance limitations determined under Section 15102 shall be adjusted by reducing the bond issuance limitation of the elementary school district by 1 percent of its total and by augmenting the bond issuance limitation for the high school district by the amount by which that of the elementary district was reduced.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15110.

An action to determine the validity of bonds and of the ordering of the improvement or acquisition may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In such action, all findings, conclusions and determinations of the legislative body which conducted the proceedings shall be conclusive in the absence of actual fraud.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15111.

The governing board of each school district or community college district shall, within 30 days after the end of each fiscal year, submit to the county superintendent of schools who has jurisdiction over the school district or community college district a report containing the following information, concerning any election held pursuant to Sections 4152, 15120, 15121, and 16058 for the approval of the issuance of bonds or the assumption of any bonded indebtedness or other indebtedness:

(1) The total amount of the bond issue, bonded indebtedness or other indebtedness involved.

(2) The percentage of registered electors of the district who voted at the election.

(3) The results of the election, with the percentage of votes cast for and against the proposition involved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions for Bond Elections [15120. - 15126.]

15120.

(a) An election held for purposes of this chapter shall be conducted as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4, except as otherwise provided in Sections 15100 to 15126, inclusive.

(b) If an election is held for purposes of this chapter in a school district, no other election may be held for purposes of this chapter in that district for a period of 90 days after that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 289, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15121.

Any election called pursuant to Sections 15100 to 15141, inclusive, and Sections 15142 to 15261, inclusive, may be consolidated with any other election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15122.

(a) A brief statement of the proposition, setting forth the amount of the bonds to be voted upon, the maximum rate of interest, and the purposes for which the proceeds of the sale of the bonds are to be used, shall be printed upon the ballot. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposition. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.

(b) A defect in
 the statement, other than in the statement of the amount of the bonds to be authorized, shall not invalidate the bonds election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15122.5.

(a) Whenever an election is called on the question of whether bonds of a school district shall be issued and sold for the purposes specified in Section 15100 and the project to be funded by the bonds will require state matching funds for any phase of the project, the sample ballot shall contain a statement, as provided in subdivision (b), advising the voters that the project is subject to the approval of state matching funds and, therefore, passage of the bond measure is not a guarantee that the project will be completed.

(b) The words to appear in the sample ballot in satisfaction of the requirements of subdivision (a) are as follows:
“Approval of Measure ____ does not guarantee that the proposed project or projects in the ____ School District that are the subject of bonds under Measure ____ will be funded beyond the local revenues generated by Measure ____. The school district’s proposal for the project or projects may assume the receipt of matching state funds, which could be subject to appropriation by the Legislature or approval of a statewide bond measure.”

(c) This section does not apply to any election to incur bonded indebtedness pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 contained in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15123.

The form and details of all ballots at school district or community college bond elections shall comply with ballot provisions of this code applicable to governing board member elections with additional requirements as provided for in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15124.

If it appears from the certificate of election results that two-thirds of the votes cast on the proposition of issuing bonds of the district are in favor of issuing the bonds; or, a majority of the votes cast, if the election is held to repair, reconstruct or replace school buildings in compliance with Section 17367 or 81162 or any other provision of law, the governing board of the school district or community college shall cause an entry of that fact to be made upon its minutes. The governing board shall then certify to the board of supervisors of the county whose superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the district, all proceedings had in the premises. The county superintendent of schools shall send a copy of the certificate of election results to the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15125.

The proceedings relating to the authorization of bonds of a joint school district of any type need be certified only to the board of supervisors of the county whose superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the district. The board of supervisors may issue and sell the bonds and no action of the board of supervisors of any other county in which the district is situated shall be required in connection with the issuance and sale, and the bonds need not be signed by any officer of any the other county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15126.

No error, irregularity, or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the taxpayers within the district or the electors voting at any election at which bonds of any district are authorized to be issued shall invalidate the election or any bonds authorized.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issuance and Sale of Bonds [15140. - 15150.]

15140.

(a) Bonds of a school district or community college district shall be offered for sale by the board of supervisors of the county, the county superintendent of which has jurisdiction over the district, or the community college district governing board, where appropriate, as soon as possible following receipt of a resolution duly adopted by the governing board of the school district or community college district. The resolution shall prescribe the total amount of bonds to be sold. The resolution may also prescribe the maximum acceptable interest rate, not to exceed 8 percent, and the time or times when the whole or any part of the principal of the bonds shall be payable, which shall not be more than 25 years from the date of the bonds.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or another provision of this chapter, the board of supervisors of any county may provide by resolution that the governing board of any school district or community college district over which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction, and which has not received a qualified or negative certification in its most recent interim report, may issue and sell bonds on its own behalf pursuant to this chapter without further action of the board of supervisors or officers of that county or of any other county in which a portion of the school district or community college district is located. The county shall levy and collect taxes, pay bonds, and hold bond proceeds and tax funds pursuant to this chapter for the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) Whenever the governing board of a school district or community college district issues bonds or refunding bonds payable from ad valorem taxes the governing board shall transmit the authorizing resolution and debt service schedule, including the debt service schedule for the bonds to be refunded, to the county auditor and county treasurer in sufficient time to permit the county to establish tax rates and necessary funds or accounts for the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 667, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

15140.5.

For purposes of this article, “bonds” means bonds, notes, warrants, or other evidence of indebtedness payable, both principal and interest, from the proceeds of ad valorem property taxes that may be levied without limitation as to rate or amount upon property subject to taxation by the governing board of the school district or community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 477, Sec. 1.   (AB 182)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15141.

When authorized by the governing board of a school district or a community college district, bonds of a school district or a community college district may be offered for sale as a group by the board of supervisors of the county, the county superintendent of schools, or the governing board of a community college district, which has jurisdiction over the district, at a time determined by the board of supervisors following receipt of a resolution duly adopted by the governing board of the school district or community college district. The resolution shall prescribe the total amount of bonds to be sold. The resolution may also prescribe the maximum acceptable interest rate, not to exceed 8 percent, and the time or times when the whole or any part of the principal of the bonds shall be payable, which shall not be more than 25 years from the date of the bonds. Bidders shall be required to bid a lump-sum bid on all bonds as a group. If bids satisfactory to the governing board of each school district included in the group are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the bidder whose bid will result in the lowest net interest cost for the group or for the bonds of any district included within the group. Bonds shall be issued and sold in the name of each school district or a community college district in the same manner as provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15142.

The bonds shall be issued in the denomination or denominations as the board of supervisors or governing board of the community college district may prescribe.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15143.

The bonds shall not bear a rate of interest greater than 8 percent per annum, payable annually or semiannually.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15144.

The number of years the whole or any part of the bonds are to run shall not exceed 25 years, from the date of the bonds or the date of any series thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15144.1.

The ratio of total debt service to principal for each bond series shall not exceed four to one.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 477, Sec. 2.   (AB 182)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15144.2.

A bond that allows for the compounding of interest, including, but not limited to, a capital appreciation bond, maturing more than 10 years after its date of issuance shall be subject to redemption before its fixed maturity date, with or without a premium, at any time, or from time to time, at the option of the issuer, beginning no later than the 10th anniversary of the date the bond that allows for the compounding of interest was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 477, Sec. 3.   (AB 182)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15144.3.

A school district or community college district with a note issued before December 31, 2013, pursuant to Section 15150 may seek from the state board or the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, as applicable, a one-time waiver from one or more of the requirements of Sections 2, 3, 5, and 6 of Assembly Bill 182 of the 2013–14 Regular Session, if both of the following are satisfied:

(a) The proceeds of the issuance subject to the waiver will be used only for the purpose of paying the note.

(b) The school district or community college district has provided to the state board or the Chancellor of the California Community
 Colleges, as applicable, an analysis from a financial adviser unaffiliated with the school district, the community college district, or the underwriter used by the school district or community college district, showing the total overall costs of the proposed bond, how the issuance is the most cost-effective method, and the reasons why the school district or community college district is unable to meet those requirements of Sections 2, 3, 5, and 6 of Assembly Bill 182 of the 2013–14 Regular Session that are the subject of the waiver.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 477, Sec. 4.   (AB 182)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15145.

(a) The board of supervisors by an order entered upon its minutes shall prescribe the form of the bonds. The bonds shall be signed by the chairperson of the board of supervisors, or by any other member thereof as the board of supervisors shall, by resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of all its members, authorize and designate for that purpose, and also signed by the treasurer of the county, and shall be countersigned by the clerk of the board of supervisors or by a deputy of either of the officers. Unless the board of supervisors otherwise provides, all the signatures and countersignatures may be printed, lithographed, engraved, or otherwise mechanically reproduced except that one of the signatures or countersignatures to the bonds shall be manually affixed. Any signature may be affixed in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials Act, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5500) of Title 1 of the Government Code. All expense incurred for the preparation, sale, and delivery of the school bonds, including but not limited to, fees of an independent financial consultant, the publication of the official notice of sale of the bonds, the preparation, printing and distribution of the official statement, the obtaining of a rating, the purchase of insurance insuring the prompt payment of interest and principal, the preparation of the certified copy of the transcript for the successful bidder, the printing of the bonds, and legal fees of independent bond counsel retained by the school district or community college district issuing the bonds are legal charges against the funds of the district issuing the bonds and may be paid from the proceeds of sale of the bonds.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, determine that all of the required signatures and countersignatures shall be by facsimiles, provided, however, that the bonds shall not be valid or become obligatory for any purpose until manually signed by an authenticating agent duly appointed by the board or its authorized designee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15146.

(a) The bonds shall be issued and sold pursuant to Section 15140, payable out of the interest and sinking fund of the school district or community college district. The governing board of the school district or community college district may sell the bonds at a negotiated sale or by competitive bidding.

(b) (1) Before the sale, the governing board of the school district or community college district shall adopt a resolution, as an agenda item at a public meeting, that includes all of the following:

(A) Express approval of the method of sale.

(B) Statement
 of the reasons for the method of sale selected.

(C) Disclosure of the identity of the bond counsel, and the identities of the bond underwriter and the financial adviser if either or both are used for the sale, unless these individuals have not been selected at the time the resolution is adopted, in which case the governing board of the school district or community college district shall disclose their identities at the public meeting occurring after they have been selected.

(D) Estimates of the costs associated with the bond issuance.

(E) If the sale includes bonds that allow for the compounding of interest, including, but not limited to, capital appreciation bonds, disclosure of the financing term and time of maturity, repayment ratio,
 and the estimated change in the assessed value of taxable property within the school district or community college district over the term of the bonds.

(2) If the sale includes bonds that allow for the compounding of interest, including, but not limited to, capital appreciation bonds, the resolution shall be publicly noticed on at least two consecutive meeting agendas, first as an information item and second as an action item.

(c) If the sale includes bonds that allow for the compounding of interest, including, but not limited to, capital appreciation bonds, the agenda item shall identify that bonds that allow for the compounding of interest are proposed and the governing board of the school district or community college district shall be presented with all of the
 following:

(1) An analysis containing the total overall cost of the bonds that allow for the compounding of interest.

(2) A comparison to the overall cost of current interest bonds.

(3) The reason bonds that allow for the compounding of interest are being recommended.

(4) A copy of the disclosure made by the underwriter in compliance with Rule G-17 adopted by the federal Municipal Securities Rulemaking Board.

(d) After the sale, the governing board of the school district or community college district shall do both of the following:

(1) Present the actual cost information for the sale at its next scheduled public meeting.

(2) Submit an itemized summary of the costs of the bond sale to the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission.

(e) The governing board of the school district or community college district shall ensure that all necessary information and reports regarding the sale or planned sale of bonds by the school district or community college district it governs are submitted to the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission in compliance with Section 8855 of the Government Code.

(f) The bonds may be sold at a discount not to exceed 5 percent and at an interest rate not to exceed the maximum rate permitted by law. If
 the sale is by competitive bid, the governing board of the school district or community college district shall comply with Sections 15147 and 15148. The bonds shall be sold by the governing board of the school district or community college district no later than the date designated by the governing board of the school district or community college district as the final date for the sale of the bonds.

(g) The proceeds of the sale of the bonds, exclusive of any premium received, shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the building fund of the school district, or community college district as designated by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual. The proceeds deposited shall be drawn out as other school moneys are drawn out. The bond proceeds withdrawn shall not be applied to any purposes other
 than those for which the bonds were issued. At no time shall the proceeds be withdrawn by the school district or community college district for investment outside the county treasury. Any premium or accrued interest received from the sale of the bonds shall be deposited in the interest and sinking fund of the school district or community college district.

(h) The governing board of the school district or community college district may cause to be deposited proceeds of sale of any series of the bonds in an amount not exceeding 2 percent
 of the principal amount of the bonds in a costs of issuance account, which may be created in the county treasury or held by a fiscal agent appointed by the school district or community college district for this purpose, separate from the building fund and the interest and sinking fund of the school district or community college district. The proceeds deposited shall be drawn out on the order of the governing board of the school district or community college district or an officer of the school district or community college district duly authorized by the governing board of the school district or community college district to make the order, only to pay authorized costs of issuance of the bonds. Upon the order of the governing board of the school district or community college district
 or duly authorized officer of the school district or community college district, the remaining balance shall be transferred to the county treasury to the credit of the building fund of the school district or community college district. The deposit of bond proceeds pursuant to this subdivision shall be a proper charge against the building fund of the school district or community college district.

(i) The governing board of the school district or community college district may cause to be deposited proceeds of sale of any series of the bonds in the interest and sinking fund of the school district or community college district in the amount of the annual reserve permitted by Section 15250 or in any lesser amount, as the governing board of the school district or community college district shall determine from time to time. The deposit
 of bond proceeds pursuant to this subdivision shall be a proper charge against the building fund of the school district or community college district.

(j) The governing board of the school district or community college district may cause to be deposited proceeds of sale of any series of the bonds in the interest and sinking fund of the school district or community college district in the amount not exceeding the interest scheduled to become due on that series of bonds for a period of two years from the date of issuance of that series of bonds. The deposit of bonds proceeds pursuant to this subdivision shall be a proper charge against the building fund of the school district or community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   (AB 2738)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15147.

Before selling the bonds, or any part of them, the board of supervisors or community college district, as appropriate, shall give notice as required by Section 53692 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 7, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 22, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

15148.

If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder or bidders, and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall prepare and certify to all of the proceedings on file in his or her office relative to the issuance and sale of the bonds, which transcript of proceedings shall be delivered to the successful bidder or bidders without charge. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received exceed either the maximum acceptable interest rate prescribed by the governing board or the maximum rate prescribed by Section 15143, or that they are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and without further authorization from the governing board, either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

For the purpose of determining whether or not a bid exceeds the maximum acceptable interest rate, the interest rate of that bid shall be deemed to be the interest rate resulting from the total net interest cost arrived at by computing the total amount of interest which the district would be required to pay from the date of the bonds to the respective maturity dates thereof at the rate or rates specified in the bid and by deducting therefrom any premium bid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15149.

The issuing school district or community college district by action of its governing board may prepare, or have prepared, bond brochures to serve as a prospectus for bond buyers to assist in the satisfactory sale of the bonds, the expense of the brochures to be payable out of the funds of the district. The brochures may be prepared only after the issuance of the bonds to be sold has been approved by the electors of the district pursuant to Sections 15120 to 15126, inclusive.

The issuing school district or community college district by action of its governing board may expend district funds for the purposes of advertising the availability of the bonds for purchase in any publication or newspaper which in the opinion of the governing board will give notice to prospective bond buyers that the bonds are available for purchase by bond buyers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15150.

(a) When the governing board of a school district or a community college district deems it in the best interests of the district, it may by resolution, upon terms and conditions that it shall prescribe, issue notes, on a negotiated or competitive-bid basis, maturing within a period not to exceed five years, in anticipation of the sale of bonds authorized pursuant to Section 15100 or Section 15340 at the time the notes are issued. The proceeds from the sale of the notes shall be used only for authorized purposes of the bonds or to repay outstanding notes authorized by this section.

(b) All notes issued and any renewal of notes shall be payable at a
 fixed time not more than five years from the date of the original issuance of the note. If the sale of the bonds does not occur before the maturity of the notes issued in anticipation of the sale, the fiscal officer of the school district or community college district, in order to meet the notes then maturing, shall issue renewal notes for this purpose. The renewal of a note may not be issued after the sale of bonds in anticipation of which the original note was issued and the maturity date of the renewed note shall not be later than five years from the date of the original issuance of the note.

(c) Every note and any renewal of a note shall be payable from the proceeds of the sale of bonds or of any renewal of notes or from other funds of the school district or community college district lawfully available for the purpose of repaying the notes,
 including state grants. The total amount of the notes or renewals of notes issued and outstanding may not at any time exceed the total amount of the unsold bonds.

(d) (1) Interest on the notes may be payable from proceeds of the sale of bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued, including any premium received on the sale of those bonds.

(2) Interest on the notes may be paid from a property tax levied for that purpose under the following conditions:

 (A) A resolution of the governing board of the school district or community college district authorizes the levying of the tax. The tax for payment of the interest on the notes is a tax authorized by law for payment of the bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued.

(B) The principal amount of the notes does not exceed the remaining principal amount of authorized but unissued bonds.

 (3) The notes may be issued only if the tax rate levied to pay interest on the notes would not cause
 the school district or community college district to exceed any of the limitations set forth in Section 15268 or 15270, as applicable.

(e) The original issuance of notes and any renewal of notes may be in the form of commercial paper notes. Each issuance of commercial paper notes to repay outstanding notes shall be deemed to be a renewal of notes subject only to the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   (AB 794)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Required Form of Bonds [15180. - 15182.]

15180.

Whenever under Sections 15100 and 15102, and Sections 15107 to 15140, inclusive, and Sections 15142 to 15261, inclusive, any bonds are issued, the bonds may be issued either in the form of coupon bonds, or in the form of registered bonds, or some in the form of coupon bonds and some in the form of registered bonds, as may be provided in the proceedings for the issuance of the bonds, and notwithstanding any language or provision to the contrary contained in any statute authorizing the issuance of the bonds, or in any other law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15181.

If any officer whose signature, countersignature, or attestation appears on any school bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature, countersignature, or attestation either on the bonds or the coupons, or on both, is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds, and the signature upon the coupons of the person who is auditor at the date of the bonds, is valid although the bonds themselves may be attested by a different person who is auditor at the time of delivery of the bonds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15182.

Any bonds executed in the manner provided by the board of supervisors shall be valid, notwithstanding any change in the officers who signed the bonds or the coupons, or in the seal of the board of supervisors, occurring after the execution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Registration of Bonds [15190. - 15194.]

15190.

Whenever the owner of any coupon bond or of any bond payable to bearer presents the bond to the treasurer or other officer of the county in which the district is located, who by law performs the duties of treasurer, with a request for the conversion of the bond into a registered bond, the treasurer or other officer shall cut off and cancel the coupons of the coupon bond, and shall stamp, print, or write upon the coupon bond or other bond payable to the bearer, either upon its back or upon its face, as may be convenient, a statement to the effect that the bond is
 registered in the name of the owner and that thereafter the interest and principal of the bond are payable to the registered owner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15191.

After registration any bond may be transferred by the registered owner in person, or by attorney duly authorized, on presentation of the bond to the treasurer or other officer performing the duties of treasurer. The bond may be again registered as before, a similar statement being stamped, printed, or written thereon.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15192.

The statement stamped, printed, or written upon the bond may be substantially in the following form: